Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1323
Annexation, merger, or consolidation; no service award benefit program; effect.

Whenever by reason of annexation, merger, or consolidation a city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a service award benefit program ceases to exist and becomes part of another city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district which is not conducting a service award benefit program, each person listed on the certification lists for all years of service completed prior to the date upon which the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district ceased to exist shall be deemed to have a nonforfeitable interest in each annual account for the years of service in which he or she was listed, notwithstanding that the person may not have qualified pursuant to sections 35-1312 and 35-1313, and shall be entitled to receive a service award benefit as provided by the provisions of the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act as if he or she had met the qualification requirements of sections 35-1312 and 35-1313.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 23.